Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2749.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 6, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-604.01, to read: START_STATUTE13-604.01. Class 4, 5 or 6 felony; misdemeanor designation; definition A. Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, if a person is convicted of a class 4, 5 or 6 felony not involving a dangerous offense, the court may enter judgment of conviction for a class 1 misdemeanor if the court determines all of the following: 1. The person has not previously been convicted of any felony offense. 2. The offense did not involve a victim. 3. The person has completed all of the terms and conditions imposed by the court for the conviction, including full payment of all monetary obligations. 4. At least five years have passed since the completion of the person's sentence, and the person has not been convicted of a subsequent misdemeanor offense involving a victim or a subsequent felony offense during that time. 5. Entering the judgment of conviction for a class 1 misdemeanor is in the interest of justice. B. This section does not apply to a person who is convicted of a violation of section 13-2910, 13-3102 or 13-3821. C. For the purposes of this section, "victim" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-4401. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Delayed repeal Section 13-604.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, is repealed from and after September 30, 2028. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.